Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-126
Dixon.

The county of Dixon is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township twenty-seven, north, of range four, east; thence east to the line dividing sections thirty-three and thirty-four in township twenty-seven, north, of range six, east; thence north to the dividing line between townships twenty-nine and thirty, north, of range six, east; thence east to the middle of the main channel of the Missouri River; thence up said channel to a point where the dividing line between ranges three and four east, intersects the same; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 16, p. 215;

R.S.1913, § 839;

C.S.1922, § 741;

C.S.1929, § 25-128;

R.S.1943, § 22-126.